Hawaii statutes.
§183D-29 Agents to collect application fees
and sell licenses. (a) The department may designate agents to collect
hunting application fees and sell hunting licenses in accordance with this
section. Agents shall report all collections of application fees and sales of
licenses to the department monthly and not later than the fifteenth day of the
month following the month covered by the report. Wilful failure to make a
report shall be cause for cancellation of the agency and upon the cancellation
a full accounting and settlement for all applications and licenses shall be
made forthwith. All fees collected including application fees shall be
remitted to the department at the same time as the report of license sales is
made. If the agents prepay for the licenses, then the fees collected shall be
retained by the agents, rather than remitted to the department.

(b) Agents shall receive ten per cent of the
value of application fees collected and licenses sold. All reports on
application fee collections and license sales shall be made on forms supplied
by the department. The duly authorized agents of the department may administer
oaths as required in license applications. Chapter 40 shall not apply to the
agents. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1987, c 160, §1; am L 1988, c 12, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next